lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
aizkliegt/%9+IB56
aizlaipot/+IB1MbJH$)
aizlaist/+b2EI[6]
aizlauzt/2+4BIe6
aizmirst/+e%ITJMF]
aizpeldçt/b+hJM(BdIc{[g1C}]
aizplçst/+FIe]T3
aizplçsât/+
aizrûkt/%9J+MB5I6
aizsvilt/+I[dMZBJ]Re^T74
aizsvîst/+%IEb7JN
aizsçrçt/+bBI)JH1M$
aiztvert/+6B05
aizòirbçt/b+I(BJhCM1
aizşòaugt/%+I95B6
apburât/{+I)BbHGg1d$[JMp]
apcietinât/+JhB(CIMb1
apdegt/+9(hBI84
apdzist/I+JeFM74
apgriezdami/=
apgrûst/+E60
apkravât/+[bHg$)IdB]JMG1{p
apkust/+I8JeFME
apkârt/+T%e]Bd6I[4
aplaupît/+M(hBIb1JC
apliekt/9+%Id6[B]5
apmelst/+eFI3
apnievât/+I)bHg$dBGM]J{1[p
applîst/+%Ie7FMJ
aprast/+bIEJ][N
apsilt/+Z^IeMJB47
apsirgt/J+Z9IB^4M
apskrûvçt/bd+$Ig[)MBJGH{]p1
aptrenkt/+IB%9d]56[
apvest/IJ+bNE[]
apvilkt/dI+B9T[J7M4]
apvilkuğies/+
apvçdît/+{J$]I)b1BHgGpdM[
apvçst/I3J+FeM
apğíindinât/+]Jdhbgc(IBC1}[{M
atbilst/+bEJ%I7
atdegt/+(h94B8IJM
atdrâzt/I6[2+dTBe4]
atdzeldama/=
atdzelt/9+BI65
atknibinât/hb+IB(MJC1
atkâtot/{$+gbG)[IHJBdMp1]
atliet/+d[8BMI4J]
atlîgot/+{bI$)]JgB1Gdp[HM
atlîst/+IbE
atnest/+J(h}IeFM8]T
atraukt/JB56M0
atskût/BI+649
atsolît/J+bhI1(BMC
atspolçt/+b)$HJIBM1
atsviest/I+62Eb
atsçşos/+
atvçst/I3J+eFM
atzît/+9^&ZdJBR[I7]4M
atèuèçt/I+b(JB1hMC
atïaut/I)+Bd$5][p6
atğíindinât/+JhbI(BCM1
bezsatura/=
briest/%I+bEJ7N
caururbt/6)+$eBI4
ceïoğa/+mS
dekodçt/+$IBJ)dbHg{MG1p[]
dilt/+7IMB^Z4Je
dzît/4+IM8B9[dJ]
formçt/+bJ]dB$g)[{IMpGH1
garkûïu/=
ieaut/JB560
iebrâzt/+[edB2IT]64
iecirtuğais/q+
iedâvinât/+bg(hCcJIB{dM1}[]
ieelst/F+e3I
ieglaust/+E06
iejâdinât/+(bIBhMgJc{dC[]1}
iekniebt/Je)$I6BM4
ielekt/%9B+605
iemçìinât/M+IhCbB(J1
iemîlamâki/o+
ienest/+e(I8hM}JFT]
ieost/+2b6EI
iepazît/+I^&9MJRB7Z[d]4
iespriegt/%+9IB56
iesprûst/+E%JbI7N
iestatît/+cb{gIhdMJ]B([C1
iesvelpt/)I+$edpBT6[]4
iesvçtît/+1gbhI{(cdJ[]BCM
ieteikdams/=
ietempt/$+6I)eB4
ieviest/e+FI3T]
ieğíiest/2EbJI6
ieğòaukt/+I%B956
ieşût/+I^7B9ZJM4
instalçt/+I1gdJB$[b){HGMp]
izdedzinât/+bIBJh(1MC
izdrâşoties/+
izgrauzt/e2J[dB4IT6M
izkadrçt/)+JMb$IBH1
izkaist/7I+J%eMF4
izlaist/+2[I6Eb]
izlekt/%5+Bd9][60
izlîgt/+9ZJIB4M^
iznesîsies/+
izpilçt/Cb+hIMB(J1
izplçst/+eI]F3T
izplûkât/g)+*&J$bBId{[Gp]1MH
izsirgt/+Z9IJ^BM4
izsprûst/+bIE%JN7
izsutinât/+(IbhJB1CM
izsvilpdamas/=
izteikt/9%+Id[B]65
iztikğot/+
izvçrt/%+6eIB4]
izíidât/+bMJ)Gg$1IBdH]p[{
izğíiest/2Eb+I6
izòurdçt/I+bC(BJh1M
jâaizkomandç/=
jâaizvadâ/=
jâaprûsç/=
jâatklaudzinâs/=
jâatğíindina/=
jâgrâmatojas/=
jâieripo/=
jâizbâş/=
jâizriet/=
jâklusina/=
jânodancinâs/=
jânoravçjas/=
jânoòurrâjas/=
jâpamûíç/=
jâpaçnojas/=
jâpiesildâs/=
jâpâresterificçjas/=
jâpârsçdina/=
jâsagaudojas/=
jâsaskumst/=
jâsmîkòâjas/=
jâuzkurc/=
jâvaldzina/=
karst/I%+FJeM
kondensçt/+G)gb$1dIBH{JpM][
kraukt/%I+B95JM6
kustinât/+(hbCJBMI1
lîòât/g+)BI$bdG1[pHJ]M{
mât/+$)6bMB&I1J
neaizslâja/=
neapskaust/bE
neatkâst/Fe
nepieraust/eF
nerrot/+IB1dJ{bG$)Mg[H]p
nesadzeru/=
noaust/+bEI62
nobirt/+eI7MBZ^4J
nodainot/+Id[{$gbJG)BH1]Mp
nodzert/(dB+Ih6[]5
nodzist/+Me4FI7J
nogalinât/+JMhIb(B1C
nokrituği/o+
nokust/I+JFeE8M
nolaist/+b2IE[6]
nomaitât/I+{b1gM)B$JGdH][p
nomirkt/Z+IB4^JM9
nomîdît/BdI+ch(bg{J1][MC
nopelt/+95B6I
noplîst/+FI%e7JM
noskaistos/+
nosprûst/%+Ib7EJN
notrûcinât/bh1(IM+BCJ
notçrçt/$+bHI1J)MB
novâkt/+%B9Id6[5]
novçrt/+d%6Te4BI[]
nozviedzamies/+
noçst/J+]bIE8[N
pabriest/%E+bJI7N
padunkât/+bd{J[$)GIB1gpHM]
padvest/e+IF3
padzît/0B7+5
paguïams/Wi+
paijât/+b[IM{$)gdH1BGJ]p
pajumt/+)$e4BI6
pakniest/F+eI3
pakârdamas/=
panîst/+7IE%]bJTN[
paplaukğíinât/+M(hbBJIC1
paplîst/+%Ie7JFM
paplûkt/+%I9B65
parauğams/iW+O
pasliktinât/ch+bg(IB[1d{J}CM]
paslâbt/J+eZ4BI7^M
paspriest/+2bIE6
pavaikstît/+G]J[dMpg{HB1
pavelt/+6IB95]d[
pavçst/I+F3e
pavçsât/+
paçst/J+Nb8IE[]
pieblietçt/HbIB1M+)$J
piebrâzt/I+2eT4Bd6[]
piedîkt/%+IB965
pieglaust/I+2[Eb6]
piekağòât/+bgMBd1IJGH)]${p[
piekrîtaties/+
piekâst/e3+IF
pieplest/I+B4
pieplûkt/I+dB%]JM69[5
pierast/+NIEbJ
pieraust/JIehF
piesmejamu/+
piesçst/%+EJbI7[]N
pietenkot/)BJ+bHI1M
pietirgot/)+BI1bJHM
piezelt/+9IB65
pirkt/+[IJ9]4TBd7M
pirmsteksta/=
posîsimies/+
pâraust/2+EIb6
pârdvest/3e+IF
pârdûmot/+$IbBH)JM1
pârgult/+eRZJ^I[7BdM5]
pârkairinât/+bB{Idg(hJ[cC1]M}
pârlaist/+E[I2b6]
pârlocît/bg+(Mdh{IJB1[]
pârmiet/+4IB7
pârpaist/+%e7IF4
pârsegt/+B6%d59][I
pârsimulçt/+b$)1BIHMJ
pârsçstoties/+
pârtîstît/+B(bh{cgdIJ[1M]C
pârvçst/e+I3F
pârğíirt/+5Bh(I6
pâròirbt/+e(hMB4J80
renderçt/b+JHI1B)$gdG{][pM
rodieties/+
saaust/+2IbE[6]
sagofrçt/1BIbJ+$)MH
sajûgt/+6%IB59
saknieğami/+
saknâbt/eB+)6$I4
sakrâmçt/+d$J]IbG)gB1[Mp{H
sakârst/+IeF
saliekdami/=
saplîst/+I7e%FJM
saraucamies/+
saskaut/$5+)IB6
saslampât/I+)dbHGgJ$BM{p][1
saslîkt/B9+Z^IJ74M
saspriest/+b6IE2][
sasprukt/J9+7MIB4
satupt/+B7T4dJI[eZ^MR]
savçrst/e+IF
sağíelt/[6IJ9d5BM]
skâbinât/bcdI+(h{JBMg[C}1]
slâpt/+eZMI^B74J
smejoğa/mS+
smilkstçt/M+(BbJCIh1
spriest/2+EbI6][
trenkt/+I9dB[%MJ65]
uzbûruğais/+q
uzcienât/$g+dG[)b{BIHpMJ1]
uzgâzt/6+e2dIBT[4]
uzklapçt/M+J$B)IbH1
uzkniest/I+F3
uzmaukt/+9%][65BdI
uzmçzdams/=
uzplîst/%I7e+JFM
uzplûst/%+EI7bJN
uzradi/+
uzskandinât/+IbMchB(J{C[g]d1}
uztapt/+[BdeJI7TM]4
uzvâlçt/+bIH)$MJ1B
uzzelt/+9BI65
uzíeramies/+
vizçt/+hbB$IHJ)(MC1
vçrst/+eFIB4T3
zust/b+IEJN8
ğíelt/I+[dB956]
ğïûkusies/+
